District of Columbia statutes.
26-551.12

Initiation of formal investigation of a financial institution.

(a)

If the Commissioner determines that a financial institution is engaging, has engaged, or may engage in an unsafe or unsound practice in the operation of the financial institution (“unsafe or unsound practice”), or that the financial institutions is engaging, has engaged, or may engage in a violation of a law, regulation, rule, condition, order, or request of the Commissioner, or any written agreement entered into with the Commissioner (“violation”), the Commissioner may conduct an investigation of the financial institution and issue and serve upon the institution a notice of charges.

(b)

The Commissioner may request that an investigation, or portion of an investigation, be conducted by a District, state, or federal law enforcement agency.

June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-308, § 112, 48 DCR 3244